lexd_components/hye-eanc_nouns.lexd
# from eanc noun lexeme list
LEXICON NounReg
նախրատափ:նախրատափ{mono}
աշխարհացույց:աշխարհացույց{mono}
խմորահունց:խմորահունց{mono}
քինածառ:քինածառ{mono}
մագնիսահաղորդիչ:մագնիսահաղորդիչ
ռադիոհաղորդիչ:ռադիոհաղորդիչ
կիսահաղորդիչ:կիսահաղորդիչ
անհաղորդիչ:անհաղորդիչ
խոսնայր:խոսնայր
քեռայր:քեռայր{mono}
հորաքեռայր:հորաքեռայր{mono}
սկեսրայր:սկեսրայր{mono}
ուսր:ուսր
գետնաշարժ:գետնաշարժ{mono}
ցլավայրի:ցլավայրի
քոշավայրի:քոշավայրի
էլեկտրասալ:էլեկտրասալ{mono}
գրչափորձ:գրչափորձ{mono}
իրիկնաշաղ:իրիկնաշաղ{mono}
իրիկնացող:իրիկնացող{mono}
պարսկահայ:պարսկահայ{mono}
ռումինահայ:ռումինահայ{mono}
սովետահայ:սովետահայ{mono}
գարնանացան:գարնանացան{mono}
անագապատ:անագապատ{mono}
միգապատ:միգապատ{mono}
սգապատ:սգապատ{mono}
գորգապատ:գորգապատ{mono}
օքսիդապատ:օքսիդապատ{mono}
ճարմանդապատ:ճարմանդապատ{mono}
զարդապատ:զարդապատ{mono}
հարդապատ:հարդապատ{mono}
մահուդապատ:մահուդապատ{mono}
կեղևապատ:կեղևապատ{mono}
սևապատ:սևապատ{mono}
ստևապատ:ստևապատ{mono}
մազապատ:մազապատ{mono}
ավազապատ:ավազապատ{mono}
պարտեզապատ:պարտեզապատ{mono}
պարտիզապատ:պարտիզապատ{mono}
երիզապատ:երիզապատ{mono}
բրոնզապատ:բրոնզապատ{mono}
փսիաթապատ:փսիաթապատ{mono}
արծաթապատ:արծաթապատ{mono}
երկաթապատ:երկաթապատ{mono}
թղթապատ:թղթապատ{mono}
մթապատ:մթապատ{mono}
թաղանթապատ:թաղանթապատ{mono}
չթապատ:չթապատ{mono}
սաղարթապատ:սաղարթապատ{mono}
մազութապատ:մազութապատ{mono}
ձյութապատ:ձյութապատ{mono}
սալապատ:սալապատ{mono}
նիկելապատ:նիկելապատ{mono}
հայելապատ:հայելապատ{mono}
մառախլապատ:մառախլապատ{mono}
ծխապատ:ծխապատ{mono}
մխապատ:մխապատ{mono}
մանվածապատ:մանվածապատ{mono}
թախծապատ:թախծապատ{mono}
քանդակապատ:քանդակապատ{mono}

տախտակապատ:տախտակապատ{mono}
բարակապատ:բարակապատ{mono}

ծաղկապատ:ծաղկապատ{mono}
ցինկապատ:ցինկապատ{mono}
մաշկապատ:մաշկապատ{mono}
պզուկապատ:պզուկապատ{mono}
գայլուկապատ:գայլուկապատ{mono}
կոշտուկապատ:կոշտուկապատ{mono}
զրահապատ:զրահապատ{mono}
պղնձապատ:պղնձապատ{mono}
սոսնձապատ:սոսնձապատ{mono}
աղապատ:աղապատ{mono}
ճաղապատ:ճաղապատ{mono}
շաղապատ:շաղապատ{mono}
մետաղապատ:մետաղապատ{mono}
թիթեղապատ:թիթեղապատ{mono}
բաղեղապատ:բաղեղապատ{mono}
հողապատ:հողապատ{mono}
ցողապատ:ցողապատ{mono}
քողապատ:քողապատ{mono}
աստղապատ:աստղապատ{mono}
ճյուղապատ:ճյուղապատ{mono}
արճիճապատ:արճիճապատ{mono}
խճապատ:խճապատ{mono}
մանրախճապատ:մանրախճապատ{mono}
ճահճապատ:ճահճապատ{mono}
արճճապատ:արճճապատ{mono}
գամապատ:գամապատ{mono}
եղյամապատ:եղյամապատ{mono}
խրամապատ:խրամապատ{mono}
տղմապատ:տղմապատ{mono}
ճմապատ:ճմապատ{mono}
մոմապատ:մոմապատ{mono}
խորշոմապատ:խորշոմապատ{mono}
չուխայապատ:չուխայապատ{mono}
ականապատ:ականապատ{mono}
պատանապատ:պատանապատ{mono}
դարանապատ:դարանապատ{mono}
վրանապատ:վրանապատ{mono}
եղեգնապատ:եղեգնապատ{mono}
մթնապատ:մթնապատ{mono}
ռետինապատ:ռետինապատ{mono}
արծնապատ:արծնապատ{mono}
ասեղնապատ:ասեղնապատ{mono}
ոստայնապատ:ոստայնապատ{mono}
բետոնապատ:բետոնապատ{mono}
լեռնապատ:լեռնապատ{mono}
ձյունապատ:ձյունապատ{mono}
սյունապատ:սյունապատ{mono}
թավշապատ:թավշապատ{mono}
մշուշապատ:մշուշապատ{mono}
փշապատ:փշապատ{mono}
կանաչապատ:կանաչապատ{mono}
ճաճանչապատ:ճաճանչապատ{mono}
ամպապատ:ամպապատ{mono}
պարսպապատ:պարսպապատ{mono}
ծառապատ:ծառապատ{mono}
աճառապատ:աճառապատ{mono}
անտառապատ:անտառապատ{mono}
պաստառապատ:պաստառապատ{mono}
մացառապատ:մացառապատ{mono}
փառապատ:փառապատ{mono}
կնճռապատ:կնճռապատ{mono}
մամռապատ:մամռապատ{mono}
ժայռապատ:ժայռապատ{mono}
միասապատ:միասապատ{mono}
երեսապատ:երեսապատ{mono}
երկսապատ:երկսապատ{mono}
բուսապատ:բուսապատ{mono}
աղյուսապատ:աղյուսապատ{mono}
մետաքսապատ:մետաքսապատ{mono}
խավապատ:խավապատ{mono}
կավապատ:կավապատ{mono}
ծովապատ:ծովապատ{mono}
պարկետապատ:պարկետապատ{mono}
ասֆալտապատ:ասֆալտապատ{mono}
կոշտապատ:կոշտապատ{mono}
վշտապատ:վշտապատ{mono}
ծղոտապատ:ծղոտապատ{mono}
մարգարտապատ:մարգարտապատ{mono}
դալարապատ:դալարապատ{mono}
գոհարապատ:գոհարապատ{mono}
կամարապատ:կամարապատ{mono}
մարմարապատ:մարմարապատ{mono}
կապարապատ:կապարապատ{mono}
ասպարապատ:ասպարապատ{mono}
խավարապատ:խավարապատ{mono}
կավարապատ:կավարապատ{mono}

քարապատ:քարապատ{mono}
շաքարապատ:շաքարապատ{mono}
ֆաներապատ:ֆաներապատ{mono}
ստվերապատ:ստվերապատ{mono}
վիրապատ:վիրապատ{mono}
մոխրապատ:մոխրապատ{mono}
ոսկրապատ:ոսկրապատ{mono}
բարձրապատ:բարձրապատ{mono}
մրապատ:մրապատ{mono}
ոզորապատ:ոզորապատ{mono}
ջրապատ:ջրապատ{mono}
փրփրապատ:փրփրապատ{mono}
ցանցապատ:ցանցապատ{mono}
բոցապատ:բոցապատ{mono}
խոցապատ:խոցապատ{mono}
ցցապատ:ցցապատ{mono}
սադափապատ:սադափապատ{mono}
թեփապատ:թեփապատ{mono}
թփապատ:թփապատ{mono}
լորձունքապատ:լորձունքապատ{mono}
մորթեպատ:մորթեպատ{mono}
ապակեպատ:ապակեպատ{mono}
հախճապակեպատ:հախճապակեպատ{mono}
ոսկեպատ:ոսկեպատ{mono}
կաշեպատ:կաշեպատ{mono}
փոշեպատ:փոշեպատ{mono}
ուսումնապետ:ուսումնապետ{mono}
սակավապետ:սակավապետ{mono}
արորավար:արորավար{mono}
